dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Fa Y 10
SFX Fa 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fa a y/xPxE .
SFX Fa a ų/xPxE .
SFX Fa a 0 .
SFX Fa a ě/xPxE .
SFX Fa 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Fa 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Fa a ojų/xPxE .
SFX Fa 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Fa a o/xPxE .

SFX Fb Y 4
SFX Fb tokoli ogokoli .
SFX Fb tokoli omkoli .
SFX Fb tokoli omukoli .
SFX Fb tokoli ymkoli .

SFX Fc Y 9
SFX Fc 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fc a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fc a e/xPxE .
SFX Fc a o/xPxE .
SFX Fc a oj/xPxE .
SFX Fc a yh/xPxE .
SFX Fc a ym/xPxE .
SFX Fc a ojų/xPxE .
SFX Fc a ymi/xPxE .

SFX Fd Y 27
SFX Fd ti jų .
SFX Fd ti m .
SFX Fd ti ješ .
SFX Fd ti š .
SFX Fd ti je .
SFX Fd ti 0 .
SFX Fd ti jemȯ .
SFX Fd ti mo .
SFX Fd ti jete .
SFX Fd i e .
SFX Fd ti jųt .
SFX Fd ti h .
SFX Fd ti še .
SFX Fd ti hmȯ .
SFX Fd ti ste .
SFX Fd ti hų .
SFX Fd ti j .
SFX Fd ti jmȯ .
SFX Fd ti jte .
SFX Fd ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Fd ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Fd ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Fd ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Fd ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Fd ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Fd ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Fd ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Fe Y 69
SFX Fe ti l .
SFX Fe ti la .
SFX Fe ti lo .
SFX Fe ti li .
SFX Fe etěti ěćų .
SFX Fe etěti ětim .
SFX Fe etěti ětiš .
SFX Fe etěti ěti .
SFX Fe etěti ětimȯ .
SFX Fe etěti ětite .
SFX Fe etěti ětęt .
SFX Fe ti h .
SFX Fe ti še .
SFX Fe ti hmȯ .
SFX Fe ti ste .
SFX Fe ti hų .
SFX Fe etěti ětęći .
SFX Fe etěti ětęća .
SFX Fe etěti ětęće .
SFX Fe etěti ětimy .
SFX Fe etěti ětimogo .
SFX Fe etěti ětimomu .
SFX Fe etěti ětimym .
SFX Fe etěti ětimom .
SFX Fe etěti ětimo .
SFX Fe etěti ětima .
SFX Fe etěti ětimų .
SFX Fe etěti ětimoj .
SFX Fe etěti ětimojų .
SFX Fe etěti ětimi .
SFX Fe etěti ětime .
SFX Fe etěti ětimyh .
SFX Fe etěti ětimym .
SFX Fe etěti ětimymi .
SFX Fe etěti ětimo .
SFX Fe ti vši .
SFX Fe ti všego .
SFX Fe ti všemu .
SFX Fe ti všim .
SFX Fe ti všem .
SFX Fe ti vših .
SFX Fe ti všimi .
SFX Fe ti vša .
SFX Fe ti všų .
SFX Fe ti všej .
SFX Fe ti všejų .
SFX Fe ti vše .
SFX Fe ti ny .
SFX Fe ti nogo .
SFX Fe ti nomu .
SFX Fe ti nym .
SFX Fe ti nom .
SFX Fe ti ni .
SFX Fe ti ne .
SFX Fe ti nyh .
SFX Fe ti nymi .
SFX Fe ti na .
SFX Fe ti nų .
SFX Fe ti noj .
SFX Fe ti nojų .
SFX Fe ti no .
SFX Fe ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Fe ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Fe ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Fe ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Fe ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Fe ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Fe ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Fe ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Ff Y 84
SFX Ff ti l .
SFX Ff ti la .
SFX Ff ti lo .
SFX Ff ti li .
SFX Ff ti jų .
SFX Ff ti m .
SFX Ff ti ješ .
SFX Ff ti š .
SFX Ff ti je .
SFX Ff ti 0 .
SFX Ff ti jemȯ .
SFX Ff ti mo .
SFX Ff ti jete .
SFX Ff i e .
SFX Ff ti jųt .
SFX Ff ti h .
SFX Ff ti še .
SFX Ff ti hmȯ .
SFX Ff ti ste .
SFX Ff ti hų .
SFX Ff ti j .
SFX Ff ti jmȯ .
SFX Ff ti jte .
SFX Ff ti jųći .
SFX Ff ti jųćego .
SFX Ff ti jųćemu .
SFX Ff ti jųćim .
SFX Ff ti jųćem .
SFX Ff ti jųćih .
SFX Ff ti jųćimi .
SFX Ff ti jųćagajųće .
SFX Ff ti jemy .
SFX Ff ti jemogo .
SFX Ff ti jemomu .
SFX Ff ti jemym .
SFX Ff ti jemom .
SFX Ff ti jemo .
SFX Ff ti jema .
SFX Ff ti jemų .
SFX Ff ti jemoj .
SFX Ff ti jemojų .
SFX Ff ti jemi .
SFX Ff ti jeme .
SFX Ff ti jemyh .
SFX Ff ti jemym .
SFX Ff ti jemymi .
SFX Ff ti jemogamy .
SFX Ff ti jemogamogo .
SFX Ff ti jemogamomu .
SFX Ff ti jemogamym .
SFX Ff ti jemogamom .
SFX Ff ti jemogamo .
SFX Ff ti vši .
SFX Ff ti všego .
SFX Ff ti všemu .
SFX Ff ti všim .
SFX Ff ti všem .
SFX Ff ti vših .
SFX Ff ti všimi .
SFX Ff ti všagavše .
SFX Ff ti všųgavše .
SFX Ff ti všejgavše .
SFX Ff ti všejųgavše .
SFX Ff ti ny .
SFX Ff ti nogo .
SFX Ff ti nomu .
SFX Ff ti nym .
SFX Ff ti nom .
SFX Ff ti ni .
SFX Ff ti ne .
SFX Ff ti nyh .
SFX Ff ti nymi .
SFX Ff ti nagano .
SFX Ff ti nųgano .
SFX Ff ti nojgano .
SFX Ff ti nojųgano .
SFX Ff ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Ff ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Ff ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Ff ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Ff ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Ff ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Ff ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Ff ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Fg Y 50
SFX Fg ti l .
SFX Fg ti la .
SFX Fg ti lo .
SFX Fg ti li .
SFX Fg ti 0 .
SFX Fg ųti em .
SFX Fg ųti eš .
SFX Fg ųti e .
SFX Fg ųti emȯ .
SFX Fg ųti ete .
SFX Fg i 0 .
SFX Fg ti h .
SFX Fg ti še .
SFX Fg ti hmȯ .
SFX Fg ti ste .
SFX Fg ti hų .
SFX Fg ųti i .
SFX Fg ųti imȯ .
SFX Fg ųti ite .
SFX Fg ti ći .
SFX Fg ti ćagnųće .
SFX Fg ųti emy .
SFX Fg ųti emogo .
SFX Fg ųti emomu .
SFX Fg ųti emym .
SFX Fg ųti emom .
SFX Fg ųti emo .
SFX Fg ųti emagnemo .
SFX Fg ųti emųgnemo .
SFX Fg ųti emojgnemo .
SFX Fg ųti emojųgnemo .
SFX Fg ųti emignemo .
SFX Fg ųti emegnemo .
SFX Fg ųti emyhgnemo .
SFX Fg ųti emymgnemo .
SFX Fg ųti emymignemo .
SFX Fg ti vši .
SFX Fg ti všego .
SFX Fg ti všemu .
SFX Fg ti všim .
SFX Fg ti všem .
SFX Fg ti vših .
SFX Fg ti všimi .
SFX Fg ti všagnųvše .
SFX Fg ti všųgnųvše .
SFX Fg ti všejgnųvše .
SFX Fg ti všejųgnųvše .
SFX Fg i y .
SFX Fg i agnųto .
SFX Fg ti ťje .

SFX Fh Y 78
SFX Fh ti l .
SFX Fh ti la .
SFX Fh ti lo .
SFX Fh ti li .
SFX Fh rati ŕų .
SFX Fh rati ŕem .
SFX Fh rati ŕeš .
SFX Fh rati ŕe .
SFX Fh rati ŕemȯ .
SFX Fh rati ŕete .
SFX Fh rati ŕųt .
SFX Fh ti h .
SFX Fh ti še .
SFX Fh ti hmȯ .
SFX Fh ti ste .
SFX Fh ti hų .
SFX Fh rati ŕi .
SFX Fh rati ŕimȯ .
SFX Fh rati ŕite .
SFX Fh rati ŕųći .
SFX Fh rati ŕųćego .
SFX Fh rati ŕųćemu .
SFX Fh rati ŕųćim .
SFX Fh rati ŕųćem .
SFX Fh rati ŕųćih .
SFX Fh rati ŕųćimi .
SFX Fh rati ŕųća .
SFX Fh rati ŕųće .
SFX Fh rati ŕemy .
SFX Fh rati ŕemogo .
SFX Fh rati ŕemomu .
SFX Fh rati ŕemym .
SFX Fh rati ŕemom .
SFX Fh rati ŕemo .
SFX Fh rati ŕema .
SFX Fh rati ŕemų .
SFX Fh rati ŕemoj .
SFX Fh rati ŕemojų .
SFX Fh rati ŕemi .
SFX Fh rati ŕeme .
SFX Fh rati ŕemyh .
SFX Fh rati ŕemym .
SFX Fh rati ŕemymi .
SFX Fh rati ŕemo .
SFX Fh ti vši .
SFX Fh ti všego .
SFX Fh ti všemu .
SFX Fh ti všim .
SFX Fh ti všem .
SFX Fh ti vših .
SFX Fh ti všimi .
SFX Fh ti vša .
SFX Fh ti všų .
SFX Fh ti všej .
SFX Fh ti všejų .
SFX Fh ti vše .
SFX Fh ti ny .
SFX Fh ti nogo .
SFX Fh ti nomu .
SFX Fh ti nym .
SFX Fh ti nom .
SFX Fh ti ni .
SFX Fh ti ne .
SFX Fh ti nyh .
SFX Fh ti nymi .
SFX Fh ti na .
SFX Fh ti nų .
SFX Fh ti noj .
SFX Fh ti nojų .
SFX Fh ti no .
SFX Fh ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Fi Y 6
SFX Fi 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fi e o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fi e ov/xPxE .
SFX Fi e ah/xPxE .
SFX Fi e am/xPxE .
SFX Fi e ami/xPxE .

SFX Fj Y 10
SFX Fj 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fj o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fj o e/xPxE .
SFX Fj o y/xPxE .
SFX Fj 0 go/xPxE .
SFX Fj o yh/xPxE .
SFX Fj 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Fj 0 mu/xPxE .
SFX Fj o ym/xPxE .
SFX Fj o ymi/xPxE .

SFX Fk Y 10
SFX Fk 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fk i o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fk i e/xPxE .
SFX Fk i ų/xPxE .
SFX Fk ki ȯk/xPxE .
SFX Fk i ah/xPxE .
SFX Fk i am/xPxE .
SFX Fk i ejų/xPxE .
SFX Fk i ami/xPxE .
SFX Fk i o/xPxE .

SFX Fl Y 11
SFX Fl 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fl a e/xPxBxO .
SFX Fl a e/xPxE .
SFX Fl a ų/xPxE .
SFX Fl ša eš/xPxE .
SFX Fl a i/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Fl a ejų/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Fl a o/xPxE .

SFX Fm Y 4
SFX Fm ěstě ohsȯt .
SFX Fm ěstě ohstah .
SFX Fm ěstě omstam .
SFX Fm ěstě omastami .

SFX Fn Y 10
SFX Fn 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fn o e/xPxBxO .
SFX Fn o e/xPxE .
SFX Fn o a/xPxE .
SFX Fn o 0 .
SFX Fn o u/xPxE .
SFX Fn o ah/xPxE .
SFX Fn o am/xPxE .
SFX Fn o em/xPxE .
SFX Fn o ami/xPxE .

SFX Fo Y 7
SFX Fo 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fo e ęte/xPxE .
SFX Fo e ęta/xPxE .
SFX Fo e ęti/xPxE .
SFX Fo e ętu/xPxE .
SFX Fo e ętem/xPxE .
SFX Fo e ętom/xPxE .

SFX Fp Y 28
SFX Fp 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 o/xBxPxE .
SFX Fp 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ogo/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ų/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 oj/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 omu/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ym/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ojų/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 e/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 yh/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ymi/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ějši/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšego/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšemu/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšim/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšem/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějše/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějša/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšų/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšej/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšejų/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějših/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšim/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ějšimi/zz .
SFX Fp 0 ěje/zz .
