dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
boa/Fa
ktokoli/Fb
narěčena/Fc
slušati/Fd
poslušati/Fd
priletěti/Fe
sęgati/Ff
sęgnųti/Fg
znajema/Fc
orati/Fh
doråstla/Fc
vȯzråstla/Fc
pantofle/Fi
šampansko/Fj
viski/Fk
viski/Fk
zapęta/Fc
mša/Fl
dvěstě/Fm
adadžo/Fn
aloe/Fo
babin/Fp
bandžo/Fn
bratov/Fp
črtov/Fp
dědov/Fp
izorati/Fh
kråljev/Fp
kriva/Fc
mamin/Fp
materin/Fp
mųžev/Fp
rad/Fp
zamša/Fl
prěměnna/Fc
